Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 12
PUBLIC-PRIVATE INITIATIVES PROGRAM

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1995 act enacting this part 12, see section 1 of chapter 90, Session Laws of Colorado 1995.

43-1-1201. Definitions.

As used in this part 12, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Private contribution" means the supply by a private entity of resources to accomplish all or any part of the work on a transportation system project, including funds, financing, income, revenue, cost sharing, technology, staff, equipment, expertise, data, or engineering, construction, or maintenance services.

"Public benefit" means a department grant of a right or interest in or concerning a transportation system project, including:

A lease or easement in, under, or above a state highway right-of-way, notwithstanding section 43-1-210;

Any use of state highway right-of-way that does not impair highway operation or safety, notwithstanding section 43-3-101 (3);

All or part of any revenue or income resulting from the private use of a state highway right-of-way;

A money payment for services from available funds; and

Any other benefit that is specifically authorized by law.

"Public-private initiative" means a nontraditional arrangement between the department and one or more private or public entities that provides for:

Acceptance of a private contribution to a transportation system project or service in exchange for a public benefit concerning that project or service other than only a money payment;

Sharing of resources and the means of providing transportation system projects or services; or

Cooperation in researching, developing, and implementing transportation system projects or services.

"Retail goods and services" means all goods and services sold to the public other than communications services.

"Transportation system" means the state transportation infrastructure and related systems, including highways and toll roads open to the public and associated rights-of-way, bridges, vehicles, equipment, park and ride lots, transit stations, transportation management systems, intelligent vehicle highway systems, and other ground transportation systems.

"Unsolicited proposal" means a written proposal for a public-private initiative that is submitted by a private entity for the purpose of entering into an agreement with the department but that is not in response to a formal solicitation or request issued by the department.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 255, § 2, effective April 17.

L. 2006:

(5) amended, p. 239, § 2, effective March 31.

43-1-1202. Department powers - definition.

Notwithstanding any other law, the department may:

Solicit and consider proposals, enter into agreements, grant benefits, and accept contributions for public-private initiatives pursuant to this part 12 concerning any of the following:

Use of advanced transportation technologies for traveler information services;

Systems for road weather information, safety warning, advanced traffic management, information broadcasting, real-time transit information, route finding and vehicle navigation, and collision avoidance;

Hazardous and nonhazardous incident detection, response, and removal and facilitation of emergency medical response;

Promotion of private investment in traffic operations centers, use of telecommunications, use of telecommuting to reduce transportation demand, conversion of defense technologies to civilian transportation uses, operational efficiency on urban and rural roads, and electronic payment for transportation services.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(a)(IV)(B) is effective until July 1, 2023.] For purposes of this subsection (1)(a)(IV), "telecommunications" does not mean the state telecommunications network described in part 5 of article 37.5 of title 24.

(B)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(a)(IV)(B) is effective July 1, 2023.

]

For purposes of this subsection (1)(a)(IV), "telecommunications" does not mean the state telecommunications network described in part 25 of article 33.5 of title 24.

Voluntary emissions testing and mitigation;

Ride matching and reservation in support of demand management;

Safety monitoring systems;

Commercial fleet management and electronic clearance of ports of entry;

Development of national standards and protocols for intelligent transportation systems;

Design, financing, construction, operation, maintenance, and improvement of toll roads open to the public and turnpike projects within the state pursuant to part 2 of article 3 of this title;

The specific information and tourist-oriented directional sign programs authorized in section 43-1-420. The department may provide by contract for private businesses to pay a reasonable fee to the department to reflect the cost of the use of highway rights-of-way and the department's costs of administering the program.

Codevelopment of transportation transfer facilities, as defined in section 43-1-1501 (3), including transfer facilities that provide retail goods and services by private entities; and

Design, financing, construction, operation, maintenance, or improvement of a high occupancy toll lane described in section 42-4-1012 (1), C.R.S.;

Solicit proposals for public-private initiatives as requests for proposals pursuant to section 24-103-203;

Consider and accept unsolicited proposals pursuant to section 43-1-1203;

Grant a public benefit in or concerning a transportation system project in exchange for a private contribution to that project, but the term of any lease, easement, or franchise granted by the department as a public benefit under this part 12 shall:

Reasonably relate to the value of the private contribution as determined by the department; and

Not exceed ninety-nine years;

Accept a private contribution to a transportation system project;

Exercise any power of the department authorized by law to facilitate the development and performance of public-private initiatives, including but not limited to the department's power of eminent domain for the purpose of acquiring property and rights-of-way necessary for the completion of a toll road or toll highway open to the public that is incorporated into the statewide transportation plan prepared pursuant to section 43-1-1103 (5).

Services shall not be provided under this part 12 unless they are consistent and compatible with the use and zoning of the land adjacent to the right-of-way.

Retail goods and services shall not be authorized under this part 12. This subsection (3) shall not prohibit:

Retail goods and services existing on April 17, 1995;

Any vending facilities, as defined in section 8-84-202 (4), C.R.S.;

The provision of retail goods and services at transfer facilities authorized under part 15 of this article.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 256, § 2, effective April 17.

L. 96:

(1)(a)(VIII) and (1)(a)(IX) amended and (1)(a)(X) added, p. 467, § 10, effective April 23.

L. 98:

(1)(a)(XI) added, p. 167, § 3, effective August 5.

L. 99:

(1)(a)(XII) added and (3) amended, p. 262, §§ 3, 4, effective April 9; (1)(a)(XIII) added, p. 1321, § 2, effective August 4.

L. 2006:

(1)(a)(X) and (1)(f) amended, p. 239, § 3, effective March 31.

L. 2015:

(3)(b) amended, (SB 15-239), ch. 160, p. 489, § 12, effective July 1, 2016.

L. 2017:

(1)(b) amended, (HB 17-1051), ch. 99, p. 353, § 74, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(1)(a)(IV) amended, (HB 18-1373), ch. 390, p. 2341, § 6, effective August 8.

L. 2022:

(1)(a)(IV)(B) amended, (HB 22-1353), ch. 479, p. 3498, § 10, effective July 1, 2023.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1998 act enacting subsection (1)(a)(XI), see section 1 of chapter 65, Session Laws of Colorado 1998. For the legislative declaration contained in the 1999 act enacting subsection (1)(a)(XII) and amending subsection (3), see section 1 of chapter 88, Session Laws of Colorado 1999. For the legislative declaration in SB 15-239, see section 1 of chapter 160, Session Laws of Colorado 2015. For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1373, see section 1 of chapter 390, Session Laws of Colorado 2018. For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1353, see section 1 of chapter 479, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

43-1-1203. Unsolicited and comparable proposals.

The department may consider, evaluate, and accept an unsolicited proposal for a public-private initiative only if the proposal complies with all of the requirements of this section.

The department may consider an unsolicited proposal only if the proposal:

Is innovative and unique;

Is independently originated and developed by the proposer;

Is prepared without department supervision;

Is not an advance proposal for a known department requirement that can be acquired by competitive methods unless:

The department has not established a timetable for satisfying the known requirement in either the state plan, as such term is defined in section 43-1-1102 (7), or the statewide transportation improvement program that is the short-range element of the state plan; or

The proposal is likely to significantly shorten a timetable for satisfying the known requirement established in the state plan or the statewide transportation improvement program; and

Includes sufficient detail and information for the department to evaluate the proposal in an objective and timely manner and to determine if the proposal benefits the department.

(2.5) Paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection (2) of this section shall not be deemed to prohibit the department from encouraging the submission of unsolicited proposals that are well-developed and consistent with the department's general policy priorities by providing written or oral information to any person regarding the policy priorities or the requirements and procedures for submitting an unsolicited proposal.

If the unsolicited proposal does not comply with the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, the department shall return the proposal without further action. If the unsolicited proposal complies with all the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, the department may further evaluate the proposal pursuant to this section.

The department shall base its evaluation of the unsolicited proposal on the following factors:

Unique and innovative methods, approaches, or concepts demonstrated by the proposal;

Scientific, technical, or socioeconomic merits of the proposal;

Potential contribution of the proposal to the department's mission;

Capabilities, related experience, facilities, or techniques of the proposer or unique combinations of these qualities that are integral factors for achieving the proposal objectives;

Qualifications, capabilities, and experience of the proposed principal investigator, team leader, or key personnel who are critical in achieving the proposal objectives; and

Any other factors appropriate to a particular proposal.

The department may accept an unsolicited proposal only if:

The unsolicited proposal receives a favorable evaluation; and

The department makes a written determination based on facts and circumstances that the unsolicited proposal is an acceptable basis for an agreement to obtain services either without competition or after the actions are taken pursuant to subsection (6) of this section, as applicable.

If the unsolicited proposal requires the department to spend public moneys in an amount that is reasonably expected to exceed fifty thousand dollars in the aggregate for any fiscal year, including an unsolicited proposal for a public project as defined in section 24-92-102 (8), C.R.S., the department shall take the following actions, except as otherwise provided in subsection (7) of this section, before accepting the unsolicited proposal:

Provide public notice that the department will consider comparable proposals. The notice shall:

Be given at least fourteen days prior to the date set forth therein for the opening of proposals, pursuant to rules. Such notice may include publication in a newspaper of general circulation at least fourteen days prior to considering comparable proposals.

Be provided to any person or entity that expresses, in writing to the department, an interest in a public-private initiative that is similar in nature and scope to the unsolicited proposal;

Outline the general nature and scope of the unsolicited proposal, including the location of the transportation system project, the work to be performed on the project, and the terms of any private contributions offered and public benefits requested concerning the project;

Request information to determine if the proposer of a comparable proposal has the necessary experience and qualifications to perform the public-private initiative; and

Specify the address to and the date by which the comparable proposals must be submitted, allowing a reasonable time to prepare and submit the proposals;

Determine, in its discretion, if any submitted proposal is comparable in nature and scope to the unsolicited proposal and warrants further evaluation;

Evaluate each comparable proposal, taking relevant factors into consideration; and

Conduct good faith discussions and, if necessary, negotiations concerning each comparable proposal.

The actions required by subsection (6) of this section do not apply to an unsolicited research proposal if the department reasonably determines that the actions would improperly disclose either the originality of the research or proprietary information associated with the research proposal.

The department may accept a comparable proposal submitted pursuant to subsection (6) of this section if the department determines that the comparable proposal is the most advantageous to the state in comparison to an unsolicited proposal or other submitted proposals.

If the unsolicited proposal is accepted or if a comparable proposal is accepted pursuant to subsection (8) of this section, the department shall use the proposal as the basis for negotiation of an agreement.

The department's procurement officer or the procurement officer's designee has the authority to make the determinations and take the actions required by this section.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 257, § 2, effective April 17.

L. 2001:

(2)(d) amended and (2.5) added, p. 1085, § 1, effective August 8.

43-1-1204. Public-private initiative agreement - definition.

The department shall enter into an agreement for each public-private initiative.

The department shall include terms and conditions in the agreement that it determines are appropriate in the public interest and to protect highway and traffic safety.

The agreement may provide that:

The private entity may pledge the transportation system project or the right-of-way involved in the transportation system project if the project or right-of-way is entirely funded by private moneys and the department determines that such a pledge is in the public interest. The private entity shall not pledge or cause a lien to be created on a transportation system project or a right-of-way involved in a transportation system project if public funds were used to purchase the project or right-of-way or the department owns the project or right-of-way.

The private entity owns the highway and right-of-way involved in the transportation system project if the project or right-of-way is entirely funded by private moneys and the department determines that such ownership is in the public interest. The department may not transfer ownership of a transportation system project or a right-of-way involved in a transportation system project if public funds were used to purchase the project or right-of-way or the department owns the project or right-of-way.

Notwithstanding the fact that the department enters into an agreement for a public-private initiative, the department is not a partner or a joint venturer with the private entity for any purpose.

Except as provided in subsection (5)(b) of this section:

The department shall not enter into any exclusive arrangement, lease, or other agreement for use of the public rights-of-way by a telecommunications provider that in any way discriminates or prevents a similar arrangement being made with any other telecommunications provider;

All leases of rights-of-way to telecommunications providers must be done on a nondiscriminatory same-term basis; and

If a telecommunications provider compensates the state in other than cash, a cash equivalent value must be imputed and attached to the agreement, and any other telecommunications provider may have equal access to the right-of-way for the cash equivalent. The cash equivalent shall be an estimate of the fair market value of the service or product provided to the state, and a telecommunications provider may ask a court of competent jurisdiction to review the imputed monetary amount, which the court may lower to the reasonable fair market value if necessary.

By August 30, 2022, the department shall develop a uniform electronic application, permitting, contract, and fee structure to facilitate nongovernmental entities' access to public rights-of-way and fiber lease or swap for the deployment of broadband.

Acceptances and denials by the department pursuant to subsections (5)(a) and (5)(b) of this section shall be provided by the department to a broadband provider in writing and shall identify specific reasons for the approval or the denial. The department shall also make available to the public the written approval or denial required by this subsection (5)(c)(I) in an online electronic format.

As used in this section, "broadband provider" has the meaning set forth in section 38-5.5-102 (3).

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 259, § 2, effective April 17.

L. 98:

(3) amended, p. 447, § 12, effective August 5.

L. 2022:

(5) amended, (SB 22-083), ch. 72, p. 369, § 1, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1998 act amending subsection (3), see section 1 of chapter 154, Session Laws of Colorado 1998.

43-1-1205. Revenue - disposition - use.

The department shall deposit any private contribution of money and any department share of revenue or income resulting from a transportation system project, if any, in the state highway supplementary fund created in section 43-1-219. The department shall use the contributed moneys for transportation purposes.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 260, § 2, effective April 17.

43-1-1206. Rules.

The transportation commission created pursuant to section 43-1-106 shall adopt rules that it determines are necessary or appropriate to implement this part 12, including rules on the solicitation and evaluation of public-private initiatives, initiative agreements, private contributions, public benefits to be granted in exchange for contributions, and the receipt, content, and proper handling of unsolicited or comparable proposals for transportation system projects.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 260, § 2, effective April 17.

43-1-1207. Applicability - public highway use by public and private entities.

This part 12 is subject to applicable state and federal laws to the extent that such laws authorize the use of public highways by any public or private entity.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 260, § 2, effective April 17.

43-1-1208. Repeal of part. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 261, § 2, effective April 17.

L. 98:

Entire section repealed, p. 447, § 11, effective August 5.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1998 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 154, Session Laws of Colorado 1998.

43-1-1209. Notice of investment opportunities.

The department or the private entity responsible for funding a public-private initiative under this part 12 may forward the agreement and a description of the investment opportunity for such initiative to any of the following for consideration under their respective statutory authority:

The board of trustees of the public employees' retirement association created under section 24-51-202, C.R.S.;

Repealed.

The board of directors of the fire and police pension association, as defined in section 31-31-102 (2), C.R.S.;

The boards of trustees of the firefighters' and police officers' old hire pension funds, as defined in section 31-30.5-102 (1.5), C.R.S.;

The board of trustees of the volunteer firefighter pension fund, as defined in section 31-30-1102 (1), C.R.S.;

Repealed.

The board of directors of the university of Colorado hospital authority, as defined in section 23-21-502 (2), C.R.S.;

The state treasurer for consideration under section 23-20-117.5, C.R.S.;

The county boards of retirement, as described in section 24-54-107, C.R.S.;

The governing boards of state colleges and universities, as defined in sections 24-54.5-102 (5) and 24-54.6-102 (4), C.R.S.; and

Any employer who has established a defined contribution plan.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 442, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2001:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1286, § 75, effective June 5.

L. 2009:

(1)(b) repealed, (SB 09-066), ch. 73, p. 260, § 25, effective July 1; (1)(d) amended, (HB 09-1030), ch. 16, p. 92, § 5, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(1)(f) repealed, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2125, § 187, effective August 11.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1998 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 154, Session Laws of Colorado 1998.